src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
айда+V:айда V_ ;
айкатӧмавны+V:айкатӧмал IV_NUAVNY ;
айтӧмавны+V+Dial/-v:айтӧмал IV_KUTNY ;
ай-мамтӧмавны+V:ай-мамтӧмал IV_NUAVNY ;
бергавны+V:бергал IV_NUAVNY ;
вовлывлыны+V+Dial/-v:воллыллы IV_VOLYNY ;
вовлыны+V:вовлы IV_VOLYNY ;
вовлыны+V+Dial/-v:воллы IV_VOLYNY ;
волькалыштны+V:волькалышт IV_KUTNY ;
волькӧтны+V:волькӧт BV_KUTNY ;
воны+Hom1+V:во V_SHUNY ;
воны+Hom2+V:во V_SHUNY ;
воны+Hom2+V:во BV_SHUNY ;
воштісьны+V:воштісь IV_ARTASJNY ;
вӧвлыны+V:вӧвлы IV_VOLYNY ;
вӧвны+V:вӧл IV_NUAVNY ;
вӧйны+V:вӧй BV_KYJNY ;
вӧйны+V:вӧ V_KYJNY ;
вувъясьны+V:вувъясь BV_ARTASJNY ;
вурсьыны+V:вурсьы BV_LYDDJYNY ;
гажтӧмавны+V+Dial/-v:гажтӧмал IV_KUTNY ;
гаравны+V:гарал BV_NUAVNY ;
горамны+V:горам BV_AMNY ;
гӧрдззыны/гӧрдззисьны+V:гӧрдззыны/гӧрдззись BV_ARTASJNY ;
гыӧв-керны+V:гыӧл-кер V_AMNY ;
дузны+V:дуз IV_KUTNY ;
дустасьны+V:дустась IV_ARTASJNY ;
дюжитны+V:дюжит BV_KUTNY ;
ентӧмавны+V:ентӧмал IV_NUAVNY ;
ёрдчыны+V:ёрдчы IV_LYDDJYNY ;
ёткисьны+V:ёткись BV_ARTASJNY ;
зэлӧтчывны+V+Dial/-v:зэлӧччыл BV_NUALNY ;
изводавны+V:изводал BV_NUAVNY ;
иньтӧмавны+V+Dial/-v:иньтӧмал IV_KUTNY ;
кеймисьны+V:кеймись BV_ARTASJNY ;
керӧв-керны+V+Dial/-v:керӧл-кер BV_AMNY ;
керыштны+Hom1+V:керышт V_KUTNY ;
киргыны+V:киргы BV_LYDDJYNY ;
койны+Hom1+V:кой BV_KYJNY ;
койны+Hom1+V:ко V_KYJNY ;
кокалыштны+V+Dial/-l0:кокаыш BV_JUAYSHNY ;
коктӧмавны+V:коктӧмал IV_NUAVNY ;
котӧртлыны+V:котӧртлы BV_VOLYNY ;
кошшисьны+V:кошшись IV_ARTASJNY ;
кошшӧв-керны+V:кошшӧл-кер V_AMNY ;
кӧдздӧтны+V:кӧдздӧт BV_KUTNY ;
куньны+V:кунь BV_ARTASJNY ;
куньыртчыны+V:куньыртчы IV_LYDDJYNY ;
курччалыштны+V:курччавыш V_JUAYSHNY ;
кывтӧмсявны+V+Dial/-v:кылтӧмсял BV_NUALNY ;
кыйны+V:кый BV_KYJNY ;
кыйны+V:кы V_KYJNY ;
кыны+V:кы^VowRet BV_SHUNY ;
лажмӧтчывны+V:лажмӧччыл V_KUTNY ;
лажмӧтчывны+V+Dial/-l:важмӧччыв BV_AMNY ;
летъявны+V:летъял BV_NUAVNY ;
лойны+V:ло V_KYJNY ;
лойны+V+Dial/-l:вой BV_KYJNY ;
локны+V:лок IV_LOKNY ;
локны+V+Dial/-l:вок IV_LOKNY ;
лоны+V:во V_SHUNY ;
лоны+V:ло BV_SHUNY ;
лоны+V+Dial/-l:во BV_SHUNY ;
лӧгавны+V:вӧгав V_AMNY ;
лыйны+V:лы V_KYJNY ;
лыйны+V+Dial/-l:вый BV_KYJNY ;
лэбтавны+V+Dial/-v:лэптал BV_NUALNY ;
лэбтісьны+V:лэбтісь IV_ARTASJNY ;
лэбтывны+V:вёптыв V_AMNY ;
лэбтыштны+V:лэбтышт BV_KUTNY ;
лэдзчывны+V:лэччыл V_KUTNY ;
лэчытсявны+V+Dial/-l:вечытсяв BV_AMNY ;
люгны+V:люг IV_AMNY ;
ляклыны+V+Dial/-l:ляквы BV_LYDDJYNY ;
малалыштны+v2+V+Err/Orth:мааыш BV_JUAYSHNY ;
мӧртчисьны+V:мӧртчись BV_ARTASJNY ;
мунлывлыны+V+Dial/-v:мунлыллы IV_VOLYNY ;
мунны+V:мун IV_KUTNY "mennä" ;
мунсьыны+V:мунсьы IV_LYDDJYNY ;
муныштлыны+V:муныштлы IV_VOLYNY ;
на+V:на V_ ;
нуны+V:ну BV_SHUNY ;
ны V_SHUNY ;
олӧв-керны+V:оӧв-кер V_AMNY ;
олыштны+V:овыш V_JUAYSHNY ;
ордавны+V:ордал BV_NUAVNY ;
ӧшны+V:ӧш IV_AMNY ;
павжнайтӧтлыны+V:павжнайтӧтлы BV_VOLYNY ;
павкны+V:павк IV_AMNY ;
павьялыштны+V+Dial/-l0:павьяыш BV_AMNY ;
панӧвтны+V:панӧлт V_KUTNY ;
пасьтӧтлыны+V+Dial/-l:пасьтӧтвы BV_LYDDJYNY ;
пашкыртчыны+V:пашкыртчы IV_LYDDJYNY ;
пельтӧмавны+V+Dial/-v:пельтӧмал IV_KUTNY ;
пиксыштны+V:пиксышт BV_KUTNY ;
подавны+Hom2+v2+V:подал BV_NUALNY ;
польны+V:поль IV_ARTASJNY ;
потшалыштны+V+Dial/-l:потшавыш BV_JUAYSHNY ;
пӧимавны+V:пӧимал BV_NUAVNY ;
пӧліньтыштны+V:пӧвиньтыш V_JUAYSHNY ;
пуктывлыны+V+Dial/-v:пуктыллы BV_VOLYNY ;
пуны+V:пу BV_SHUNY ;
пымӧтчывлыны+V+Dial/-l:пымӧччыввы BV_LYDDJYNY ;
сетчыны+V:сетчы IV_LYDDJYNY ;
сибдалыштны+v2+V+Err/Orth:сибдаыш BV_JUAYSHNY ;
синмавлыны+V+Dial/-v:синмаллы BV_VOLYNY ;
смевмыштны+V:смелмыш V_JUAYSHNY ;
смевсялыштны+V:смевсявыш V_AMNY ;
сӧдзӧтсьыны+V:сӧдзӧтсьы BV_LYDDJYNY ;
стружитчӧв-керны+V+Dial/-v:стружиччӧл-кер BV_AMNY ;
сувтны+V:султ V_KUTNY ;
сувтчывны+V+Dial/-v:сулччыл BV_NUALNY ;
сунавны+V:сунал BV_NUAVNY ;
сывьясьыштны+V:сывьясьышт BV_KUTNY ;
сюйны+V:сюй BV_KYJNY ;
сюйны+V:сю V_KYJNY ;
томмывлыштны+V+Dial/-v:томмыллыш BV_JUAYSHNY ;
тӧдмавлыны+V:тӧдмавлы BV_VOLYNY ;
тӧждісьны+V:тӧждісь BV_ARTASJNY ;
тувьявны+V+Dial/-v:тулъял BV_NUALNY ;
туйны+V:туй BV_KYJNY ;
тупкалыштны+V:тупкаыш V_JUAYSHNY ;
тырмӧтчыны+V:тырмӧтчы IV_LYDDJYNY ;
тышкасьны+V:тышкась IV_ARTASJNY ;
узӧлавны+v2+V+Err/Orth:узӧав BV_AMNY ;
чарьявны+V:чарьял BV_NUAVNY ;
чашкалыштны+v2+V+Err/Orth:чашкаыш BV_JUAYSHNY ;
чеглалӧв-керны+V:чегваӧв-кер V_AMNY ;
чеччӧвтлыны+V+Dial/-v:чеччӧлтлы BV_VOLYNY ;
чеччылыштны+V:чеччыыш V_JUAYSHNY ;
чивӧстны+V:чилӧс V_CHILOESNY ;
чивӧстны+V+Dial/-v:чилӧс BV_CHILOESNY ;
чивӧстны+V+Dial/-l0:чиӧс BV_CHILOESNY ;
чизыртны+V:чизырт BV_KUTNY ;
чужсьыны+V:чужсьы BV_LYDDJYNY ;
чывкьявны+V:чылкьял V_KUTNY ;
шедтывны+V+Dial/-v:шеттыл BV_NUALNY ;
шуны+V:шу BV_SHUNY ;
шыннялыштны+v2+V+Err/Orth:шынняыш BV_JUAYSHNY ;
югмывлыны+V:югмывлы BV_VOLYNY ;
